th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า > แผงเซลล์แสงอาทิตย์: แผงเซลล์แสงอาทิตย์ชนิดโมโนคริสตัลไลน์; แผงเซลล์แสงอาทิตย์ชนิดโพลีคริสตัลไลน์; แผงเซลล์แสงอาทิตย์แบบฟิล์มบาง
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα > Ηλιακοί συλλέκτες: Μονοκρυσταλλικοί ηλιακοί συλλέκτες; Πολυκρυσταλλικοί ηλιακοί συλλέκτες; Ηλιακοί συλλέκτες λεπτού φιλμ
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace > Solární panely: Monokrystalické solární panely; Polykrystalické solární panely; Tenkovrstvé solární panely
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품 > 태양 전지판: 단결정 태양 전지판; 다결정 태양 전지판; 박막 태양 전지판
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet > Aurinkopaneelit: Yksikiteiset aurinkopaneelit; Monikiteiset aurinkopaneelit; Ohutkalvoaurinkopaneelit
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr > Solpaneler: Monokrystallinske solcellepaneler; Polykrystallinske solcellepaneler; Tynnfilm-solcellepaneler
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи > Соларни панели: Монокристални соларни панели; Поликристални соларни панели; Тънкослойни соларни панели
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys > Saulės baterijos: Monokristalinės saulės baterijos; Polikristalinės saulės baterijos; Plonasluoksnės saulės baterijos
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品 > 太阳能光伏板: 单晶太阳能光伏板; 多晶太阳能光伏板; 薄膜太阳能光伏板
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie > Solárne panely: Monokryštalické solárne panely; Polykryštalické solárne panely; Tenké solárne panely
tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri > Güneş Enerjisi Panelleri: Monokristalin Güneş Panelleri; Polikristalin Güneş Panelleri; İnce Film Güneş Panelleri
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica > Painéis solares: Painéis solares monocristalinos; Painéis solares policristalinos; Painéis solares de película fina
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf > Solarpaneele: Monokristalline Solarpaneele; Polykristalline Solarpaneele; Dünnschicht-Solarpaneele
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek > Napelemek: Monokristályos napelemek; Polikristályos napelemek; Vékonyrétegű napelemek
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden > Zonnepanelen: Monokristallijne zonnepanelen; Polykristallijne zonnepanelen; Dunnefilmzonnepanelen
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品 > 太陽能板: 單晶太陽能板; 多晶太陽能板; 薄膜太陽能板
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện > Tấm pin năng lượng mặt trời: Tấm pin năng lượng mặt trời đơn tinh thể; Tấm pin năng lượng mặt trời đa tinh thể; Tấm pin năng lượng mặt trời màng mỏng
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema > Sončni paneli: Monokristalni sončni paneli; Polikristalni sončni paneli; Tankoplastni sončni paneli
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies > Solar Panels: Monocrystalline Solar Panels; Polycrystalline Solar Panels; Thin-Film Solar Panels
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche > Pannelli solari: Pannelli solari monocristallini; Pannelli solari policristallini; Pannelli solari a film sottile
sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör > Solcellspaneler: Monokristallina solpaneler; Polykristallina solpaneler; Tunnfilmssolpaneler
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice > Panouri solare: Panouri solare monocristaline; Panouri solare policristaline; Panouri solare cu peliculă subțire
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置 > ソーラーパネル: 単結晶ソーラーパネル; 多結晶ソーラーパネル; 薄膜太陽電池パネル
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne > Panele słoneczne: Monokrystaliczne panele słoneczne; Polikrystaliczne panele słoneczne; Cienkowarstwowe panele słoneczne
es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos > Paneles solares: Paneles solares monocristalinos; Paneles solares policristalinos; Paneles solares de película delgada
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos > Painéis solares: Painéis solares monocristalinos; Painéis solares policristalinos; Painéis solares de película fina
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr > Solpaneler: Monokrystallinske solpaneler; Polykrystallinske solpaneler; Solpaneler med tynd film
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema > Solarne ploče: Monokristalne solarne ploče; Polikristalne solarne ploče; Solarne ploče od tankog filma
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques > Panneaux solaires: Panneaux solaires monocristallins; Panneaux solaires polycristallins; Panneaux solaires en couches minces
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения > Солнечные панели: Монокристаллические солнечные панели; Поликристаллические солнечные панели; Тонкопленочные солнечные панели